Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2983
Effect of dissociation as member.

(1) Upon a person's dissociation as a member:

(a) A person dissociated pursuant to section 21-2982 does not have further rights as a member; and

(b) Subject to sections 21-2947 and 21-2948, any financial rights owned by the person in the person's capacity as a member immediately before dissociation are owned by the person as a transferee who is not admitted as a member after dissociation.

(2) A person's dissociation as a member does not of itself discharge the person from any obligation to the limited cooperative association which the person incurred while a member.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 83.